Louisiana, session 2026, HB638.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2784 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2784. Late payment by contractors to subcontractors and suppliers; penalties
Prompt payment by owners to contractors; prompt payment to subcontractors
and suppliers; penalties; action to collect payment; attorney fees and costs
A.(1) If an owner or person authorized to act on behalf of the owner receives
a written payment request from a contractor for an amount payable under a contract
for construction of improvements made to an immovable for properly performed
work or suitably stored or specially fabricated materials under the contract, the
owner shall pay the amount owed to the contractor, unless any amount is withheld
as authorized by law, the contract, or this Section, no later than thirty-five days
following receipt of the written request.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 638 ENROLLED
(2) If the owner or person authorized to act on behalf of the owner fails to
make payment to the contractor within thirty-five days of the receipt of the written
payment request from a contractor for improvements to an immovable, in the
absence of a good faith dispute, the owner shall pay to the contractor a penalty in
accordance with Subsection D of this Section. This penalty shall be in addition to
any other remedies authorized by law or the contract for construction on or
improvements to the immovable.
B.(1) When a A contractor who receives any payment from the owner for
improvements to an immovable after the issuance of a certificate of payment by the
architect or engineer, or when a contractor receives any payment from the owner for
improvements to an immovable when no architect or engineer is on the job, or
person authorized to act on behalf of the owner for the construction of or for
improvements made to an immovable the contractor shall promptly pay such monies
received shall promptly pay each subcontractor and supplier the portion of payment
that is attributable to work properly performed or materials suitably stored or
specially fabricated as provided by the contract by the subcontractor or supplier,
including any interest accrued, to the extent of the subcontractor or supplier's interest
in the payment. to each subcontractor and supplier in proportion to the percentage
of work completed prior to the issuance of the certificate of payment by such
subcontractor and supplier, or by the owner if no architect or engineer is on the job.
Further, whenever a subcontractor receives payment from the contractor, the
subcontractor shall promptly pay such monies received to each sub-subcontractor
and supplier in proportion to the work completed. The payment required by this
Subsection shall be made no later than the seventh day after the date the contractor
receives payment from the owner or person authorized to act on behalf of the owner.
(2) A subcontractor who receives a payment from the contractor pursuant to
this Section or from a contractor in connection with a contract to improve an
immovable shall promptly pay each subcontractor and supplier the portion of the
payment that is attributable to work properly performed or materials suitably stored
or specially fabricated as provided under the contract by the subcontractor or
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 638 ENROLLED
supplier, including any interest, to the extent of the subcontractor's or supplier's
interest in the payment. The payment required by this Subsection shall be made no
later than the seventh day after the date the subcontractor receives payment from the
contractor.
B. If for any reason the contractor receives less than the full payment from
the owner, then the contractor shall be obligated to disperse only the funds received
on a prorated basis with the contractor, subcontractors, and suppliers each receiving
a prorated portion based on the amount due on the payment.
C. (3) If the contractor or subcontractor without reasonable cause fails to
make any payment that is due to his subcontractors and suppliers within fourteen
seven consecutive days of the receipt of payment from the owner or contractor for
improvements to an immovable in the absence of a good faith dispute, the contractor
or subcontractor shall pay to the subcontractors and suppliers, in addition to the
payment, a penalty in the amount of one-half of one percent of the amount due, per
day, from the expiration of the period allowed herein for payment after the receipt
of payment from the owner. The total penalty shall not exceed fifteen percent of the
outstanding in accordance with Subsection D of this Section. This penalty shall be
in addition to any other remedies authorized by law, the contract for construction on
or improvements to the immovable, or any other agreement between the contractor,
subcontractor, or suppliers. balance due. In addition, the contractor or subcontractor
shall be liable for reasonable attorney fees for the collection of the payments due the
subcontractors and suppliers. However, any claim which the court finds to be
without merit shall subject the claimant to all reasonable costs and attorney fees for
the defense against such claim.
C. If a good faith dispute exists concerning the amount owed for a payment
requested or required by this Section under a contract for construction of or
improvements to an immovable, the owner, contractor, or subcontractor disputing
the obligation to pay shall pay the amount that is not in dispute by the applicable date
required by this Section. For purposes of this Section, a good faith dispute may
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 638 ENROLLED
include a dispute regarding whether the work was performed in a proper manner
under the contract.
D.(1) An unpaid amount as described in this Section shall incur a penalty at
the rate of one and one-half percent of the unpaid amount per month. This penalty
begins to accrue the day after the date on which the payment is due.
(2) The penalty on any unpaid amounts pursuant to this Section stops
accruing on the earlier of the date of delivery of payment, the date the payment is
mailed if delivered within three days, or the date a judgment is rendered on an action
brought pursuant to this Section.
E. A waiver of a provision of this Section shall be absolutely null. However,
a written contract between an owner and a contractor for improvements on or
construction of a single-family residence may provide that the payment required in
accordance with this Section be made at a time not later than sixty-one days after the
date the owner receives the payment request. Any unpaid amount under contract that
allows payment later than the date otherwise required by Subsection A of this
Section incurs a penalty in accordance with Subsection D of this Section.
F. A contractor, subcontractor, or supplier may bring an action to collect the
payments and penalties owed in accordance with this Section. The court shall award
court costs and reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party. The rights and
remedies provided by this Section are in addition to any other rights and remedies
available under the law or contract. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to
create a right of action of the contractor, subcontractor, or supplier against a lender
or insurer.
D. G.(1) The provisions of this Section shall not be applicable to
improvements to immovable property used for residential purposes. The provisions
of this Section do not supercede the prompt payment obligations and penalties for
contracts with a public entity as required in R.S. 38:2191.
(2) The date of payment required of the owner pursuant to this Section shall
be the later of thirty-five days after the date the owner receives the payment request
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 638 ENROLLED
or the fifth day after the date the owner receives loan proceeds for the payment that
is due when all of the following occurs:
(a) The owner has, prior to the contractor's payment request, obtained a loan
intended to pay for all or part of a contract to improve immovable property.
(b) The owner has timely and properly requested disbursement of proceeds
from that loan.
(3) This Section does not apply to any of the following:
(a) Agreements authorizing the exploration, production, manufacturing, or
development of oil, natural gas, natural gas liquids, synthetic gas, sulphur, ore,
chemicals, or other mineral substances, including any lease or royalty agreement,
joint interest agreement, production or production-related agreement, operating
agreement, farmout agreement, area of mutual interest agreement, or other related
agreement.
(b) Well or mine services.
(c) The purchase, sale, gathering, storage, or transport of oil, natural gas,
natural gas liquids, synthetic gas, or other hydrocarbon substances by pipeline or by
a fixed associated facility.
(d) For the purposes of this exemption, "agreement" includes a written or
oral agreement or understanding that does any of the following:
(i) Provides work or services, including any construction, operating, repair,
or maintenance services.
(ii) Performs a part of the services covered by Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph or an act collateral to those services, including furnishing or renting
equipment, incidental transportation, or other goods and services furnished in
connection with those services.
(e) For the purposes of this exemption, "well or mine services" includes
either of the following:
(i) Drilling, deepening, reworking, repairing, improving, testing, treating,
perforating, acidizing, logging, conditioning, purchasing, gathering, storing, or
transporting oil or natural gas, brine water, fresh water, produced water, condensate,
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 638 ENROLLED
petroleum products, or other liquid commodities, or otherwise rendering services in
connection with a well drilled to produce or dispose of oil, gas, or other minerals or
water.
(ii) Designing, excavating, constructing, improving, or otherwise rendering
services in connection with an oil, gas, or other mineral production platform or
facility, mine shaft, drift, or other structure intended directly for use in exploring for
or producing a mineral.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.